Maryland, session 2026, SB0329.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
7–137.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0329*

SENATE BILL 329
(2) “NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION” MEANS AN ORGANIZATION THAT IS
NOT SUBJECT TO TAXATION UNDER § 501(C)(3) OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE
AND IS NOT A PRIVATE FOUNDATION.
(3) “SCHOLARSHIP GRANTING ORGANIZATION” HAS THE MEANING
STATED IN § 25F OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE.
(B) IT IS THE INTENT OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY THAT THIS SECTION BE
CONSTRUED IN A MANNER THAT IS CONSISTENT WITH, AND ENABLES THE STATE TO
PARTICIPATE IN, THE FEDERAL TAX CREDIT SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAM ESTABLISHED
UNDER § 25F OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE.
(C) TO CARRY OUT SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, THE DEPARTMENT
SHALL:
(1) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION, APPROVE AND
CERTIFY A NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION AS A SCHOLARSHIP GRANTING
ORGANIZATION IF THE NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION:
(I) IS ORGANIZED UNDER THE LAWS OF THE STATE;
(II) PROVIDES SCHOLARSHIPS TO ELIGIBLE STUDENTS, AS
DEFINED IN § 25F OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE, IN THE STATE; AND
(III) APPLIES TO THE DEPARTMENT IN ACCORDANCE WITH
SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(2) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1 EACH YEAR, BEGINNING IN 2027,
SUBMIT TO THE SECRETARY OF THE U.S. DEPARTMENT OF THE TREASURY A LIST
OF SCHOLARSHIP GRANTING ORGANIZATIONS IN THE STATE.
(D) (1) A NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION SEEKING STATUS AS A
SCHOLARSHIP GRANTING ORGANIZATION SHALL APPLY TO THE DEPARTMENT FOR
APPROVAL AND CERTIFICATION AS REQUIRED BY THE DEPARTMENT.
(2) EACH YEAR, EACH SCHOLARSHIP GRANTING ORGANIZATION
SHALL SUBMIT TO THE DEPARTMENT A FINANCIAL STATEMENT AND PROGRAM
REPORT AS REQUIRED BY THE DEPARTMENT DEMONSTRATING COMPLIANCE WITH
THIS SECTION.
(E) EACH YEAR, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL MAKE AVAILABLE ONLINE A
REPORT THAT INCLUDES:

SENATE BILL 329 3
(1) THE NUMBER OF SCHOLARSHIPS AWARDED BY EACH
SCHOLARSHIP GRANTING ORGANIZATION;
(2) THE AVERAGE AND MEDIAN SCHOLARSHIP AMOUNTS; AND
(3) THE SCHOOLS ATTENDED BY SCHOLARSHIP RECIPIENTS.
(F) THE COMPTROLLER SHALL MAKE AVAILABLE ONLINE GUIDANCE THAT
ASSISTS INDIVIDUAL TAXPAYERS IN CLAIMING THE FEDERAL INCOME TAX CREDIT
ALLOWABLE UNDER § 25F OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE FOR MAKING
QUALIFIED CONTRIBUTIONS, AS DEFINED IN § 25F OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE
CODE, TO SCHOLARSHIP GRANTING ORGANIZATIONS DURING A TAXABLE YEAR.
(G) (1) AS AUTHORIZED BY STATE AND FEDERAL LAW, THE DEPARTMENT
AND THE COMPTROLLER MAY SHARE INFORMATION AS NECESSARY TO CARRY OUT
THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE COMPTROLLER,
MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS SECTION, INCLUDING REGULATIONS
GOVERNING REPORTING, ACCOUNTABILITY, AND PENALTIES FOR NONCOMPLIANCE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.